Utah statutes.
35A-3-113.   Prohibition of charges or fees for representing applicants.

A person may not make any charge or receive any fee for representing an applicant or client in any proceeding under this chapter, except criminal proceedings, or with respect to any application, whether the fee or charge is to be paid by the applicant, client, or any other person, if that fee is in excess of an amount determined by the court or body before whom an applicant or client has been represented.

